sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-keeuh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - ǩeeuʹh class A40e: # Adjective 'poor/köyhä' - full paradigm
    ǩeeuʹh+A+Pred+Sg: ǩeeuʹh
    ǩeeuʹh+A+Pred+Pl: ǩeeuʹh
    ǩeeuʹh+A+Attr: ǩeeuʹhes
    ǩeeuʹh+A+Comp: ǩeeuʹhab
    ǩeeuʹh+A+Superl: ǩeeuʹhmõs
